apertium-rus-ukr.ukr.dix
<pardef n="країн/а__n_f_nn">
  <e>       <p><l>а</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>у</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ою</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>о</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ам</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ах</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ами</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="кільк/ість__n_f_nn">
  <e>       <p><l>ість</l><r>ість<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ість</l><r>ість<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ості</l><r>ість<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ості</l><r>ість<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ості</l><r>ість<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>істю</l><r>ість<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>осте</l><r>ість<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ості</l><r>ість<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ості</l><r>ість<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>остей</l><r>ість<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>остям</l><r>ість<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>остях</l><r>ість<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>остями</l><r>ість<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ості</l><r>ість<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="міністр__n_m_aa">
  <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>а</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>а</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ові</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>у</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ові</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ом</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>е</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ів</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ів</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ам</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ах</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ами</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="міст/о__n_nt_nn">
  <e>       <p><l>о</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>о</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>а</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>у</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ом</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>о</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>а</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>а</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ам</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ах</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ами</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>а</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="місц/е__n_nt_nn">
  <e>       <p><l>е</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>е</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>я</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ю</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ем</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>е</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>я</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>я</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ь</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ям</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ях</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ями</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>я</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="країна"><i>країн</i><par n="країн/а__n_f_nn"/></e>
<e lm="кількість"><i>кільк</i><par n="кільк/ість__n_f_nn"/></e>
<e lm="міністр"><i>міністр</i><par n="міністр__n_m_aa"/></e>
<e lm="місто"><i>міст</i><par n="міст/о__n_nt_nn"/></e>
<e lm="місце"><i>місц</i><par n="місц/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
